Maryland, session 2025, HB0745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
17–6A–13.
(a) (1) The Board shall issue a license to any applicant who meets the
requirements of this subtitle.
(2) IF AN APPLICANT SUBMITS A COMPLETE APPLICATION FOR
LICENSURE AND MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD SHALL
ISSUE THE LICENSE WITHIN 10 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE COMPLETED
APPLICATION.
(3) IF AN APPLICANT SUBMITTED AN INCOMPLETE APPLICATION BUT
IS DETERMINED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE BASED ON
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION SUBMITTED BY THE APPLICANT, THE BOARD SHALL
ISSUE THE LICENSE WITHIN 30 50 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION.
(b) The Board shall include on each license that the Board issues:
(1) The full name of the licensed behavior analyst;
– 1 –

Ch. 755 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) The dates of issuance and expiration;
(3) A serial number;
(4) The signatures of the chair and the vice chair of the Board; and
(5) The seal of the Board.
(c) (1) On receipt of the criminal history record information of an applicant for
licensure forwarded to the Board in accordance with § 17–501.1 of this title, in determining
whether to grant a license, the Board shall consider:
(i) The age at which the crime was committed;
(ii) The circumstances surrounding the crime;
(iii) The length of time that has passed since the crime;
(iv) Subsequent work history;
(v) Employment and character references; and
(vi) Other evidence that demonstrates whether the applicant poses a
threat to the public health or safety.
(2) The Board may not issue a license if the criminal history record
information required under § 17–501.1 of this title has not been received.
(D) (1) THE BOARD SHALL SEND AN E–MAIL NOTIFICATION TO AN
APPLICANT WHEN THE BOARD:
(I) RECEIVES THE APPLICATION;
(II) BEGINS ITS REVIEW OF THE APPLICATION;
(III) DETERMINES THAT THE APPLICATION IS COMPLETE OR THE
APPLICATION NEEDS ADDITIONAL INFORMATION; OR
(IV) DECIDES TO ISSUE OR DENY THE LICENSE.
(2) AT THE REQUEST OF AN APPLICANT OR A THIRD PARTY
DESIGNATED BY THE APPLICANT, THE BOARD SHALL PROVIDE ADDITIONAL E–MAIL
NOTIFICATIONS REGARDING THE STATUS OF THE APPLICATION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 755
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –